Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,117
Department; annual statistical report.

The department shall publish an annual statistical report from information collected under section 81-6,114 which shall include: (1) The twenty most frequently performed outpatient surgical procedures by type of procedure; (2) the total number of persons served for each listed procedure; (3) the total number of persons served by county and state of residence and region of service; and (4) the average billed charges for such procedures by county and state of residence. The department shall designate service regions for the purpose of aggregating and reporting information as required by this section. No information shall be published or disclosed by the department under this section in a manner that identifies or may be used to identify any individual hospital or ambulatory surgical center.

Laws 2003, LB 73, § 7.